Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-902
Bail; proceeding for taking.

For taking such bail, the judge may, by his special warrant under his hand and seal, require the sheriff or jailer to bring such accused before him at the courthouse of the proper county at such time as in such warrant the judge may direct.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 347, p. 802;

R.S.1913, § 9004;

C.S.1922, § 10028;

C.S.1929, § 29-902;

R.S.1943, § 29-902.